pt-BR: Tipo de coador de coquetel: Cone; Malha fina; Hawthorne; Julep japonês; Julep; Disco perfurado; Peneira de colher; Coador em formato de T; Outro
ru: Тип стрейнера для коктейлей: Конусный; Мелкосетчатый; Хоторн; Японский джулеп; Джулеп; Перфорированный диск; Ложка-сито; Т-образный фильтр; Другой
ro-RO: Tip de strecurătoare pentru cocktailuri: Con; Sită fină; Hawthorne; Julep japonez; Julep; Disc perforat; Lingură strecurătoare; Strecurătoare în T; Altele
vi: Loại rây lọc cocktail: Hình nón; Lưới mịn; Dụng cụ lọc Hawthorne; Dụng cụ lọc Julep Nhật Bản; Dụng cụ lọc Julep; Đĩa đục lỗ; Muỗng lọc; Dụng cụ lọc hình chữ T; Khác
ko: 칵테일 스트레이너 유형: 원뿔; 고운 망; 호손; 재패니즈 줄렙; 줄렙; 타공 디스크; 스푼 여과기; T자형 여과기; 기타
th: ประเภทของที่กรองค็อกเทล: ทรงกรวย; ตาข่ายละเอียด; ฮอว์ธอร์น; จูเลปญี่ปุ่น; จูเลป; แผ่นเจาะรู; ช้อนกรอง; ที่กรองทรงตัว T; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος σουρωτηριού κοκτέιλ: Κωνικό; Με λεπτό πλέγμα; Hawthorne; Japanese julep; Julep; Διάτρητος δίσκος; Σουρωτήρι τύπου κουταλιού; Σουρωτήρι τύπου Τ; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ sitka na koktaily: Kužeľový; Jemná sieťovina; Hawthorne; japonské julepové sitko; julepové sitko; perforovaný kotúč; lyžicové sitko; Sitko v tvare T; Iné
zh-TW: 隔冰匙類型: 錐形; 細網眼; 霍桑; 日式茱莉普; 茱莉普; 穿孔圓盤; 湯匙形隔冰器; T 型隔冰器; 其他
de: Cocktailsiebtyp: Kegel; Feinmaschig; Hawthorne; Japanischer Julep; Julep; Lochscheibe; Löffelsieb; T-Sieb; Sonstiges
tr: Kokteyl süzgeç tipi: Koni; İnce süzgeç; Hawthorne; Japon julep'i; Julep; Delikli disk; Kaşık tipi süzgeç; T tipi süzgeç; Diğer
en: Cocktail strainer type: Cone; Fine mesh; Hawthorne; Japanese julep; Julep; Perforated disc; Spoon strainer; T-strainer; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta cedila za koktajle: Stožec; Fina mreža; Hawthorne; Japonski julep; Julep; Perforirani disk; Cedilo z žlico; T-cedilo; Druga
bg-BG: Тип цедка за коктейли: Конусна; Фина мрежа; Хоторн; Японски джулеп; Джулеп; Перфориран диск; Лъжица с цедка; Т-филтър; Друго
sv: Typ av cocktailsil: Kon; Finmaskig; Hawthorne; Japansk julep; Julep; Perforerad skiva; Skedsil; T-sil; Övrigt
da: Cocktail-sitype: Kegle; Fin filtrering; Hawthorne; Japansk julep; Julep; Perforeret skive; Skefilter; T-filter; Andet
pl: Typ sitka do koktajli: Stożkowe; Drobna siatka; Sitko Hawthorne; Sitko japońskie Julep; Sitko Julep; Sitko perforowane; Sitko łyżkowe; Sitko typu T; Pozostałe
cs: Typ koktejlového sítka: Kuželové; Jemné; Hawthorne; Japonské sítko julep; Julep; Děrovaný kotouč; Lžičkové sítko; T-sítko; Jiné
es: Tipo colador para cócteles: Cono; Malla fina; Hawthorne; Julep japonés; Julep; Disco perforado; Colador de cuchara; Colador en T; Otros
pt-PT: Tipo de coador de cocktail: Cone; Malha fina; Hawthorne; Julep japonês; Julep; Disco perfurado; Coador de colher; Coador em T; Outro
ja: カクテルストレーナーの種類: 円錐形; ファインメッシュ; ホーソーン; ジャパニーズジュレップ; ジュレップ; 穴あきディスク; スプーンストレーナー; T型ストレーナー; その他
it: Tipo di colino da cocktail: Cono; Maglia fine; Biancospino; Julep giapponese; Julep; Disco perforato; Colino a cucchiaio; Filtro a T; Altro
zh-CN: 鸡尾酒过滤器类型: 圆锥型; 细网; 霍桑; 日式朱利普; 朱利普; 多孔圆盘; 勺形滤网; T 形滤网; 其他
fi: Cocktail-siivilätyyppi: Kartio; Hienojakoinen verkko; Orapihlaja; Japanilainen julep; Julep; Reikälevy; Lusikkasiivilä; T-siivilä; Muu
lt-LT: Kokteilių sietelio tipas: Gaubtas; Smulkus tinklelis; „Hawthorne“ tipo; „Japanese julep“ tipo; „Julep“ tipo; Perforuotas diskas; Šaukšto sietelis; T formos sietelis; Kita
hu: Koktélszűrő típusa: Tölcsér; Finom hálós; Hawthorne; Japán julep; Julep; Perforált lemez; Kanalas szűrő; T-szűrő; Egyéb
fr: Type de passoire à cocktail: Cône; À mailles fines; Hawthorne; Julep japonaise; Julep; Disque perforé; Passoire à cuillère; Passoire en T; Autre
nl: Type cocktailzeef: Conisch; Fijnmazig; Hawthorne; Japanse julep; Julep; Geperforeerde schijf; Lepelzeef; T-zeef; Overig
hr-HR: Vrsta cjedila za koktele: Čunj; Fina mrežica; Hawthorne; Japanski julep; Julep; Perforirani disk; Cjediljka u obliku žlice; T-cjedilo; Ostalo
nb: Cocktailsil-type: Kjegle; Finmasket; Hawthorne; Japansk julep; Julep; Perforert skive; Skjefilter; T-sil; Annet